District of Columbia statutes.
42-1904.07

Registration; annual updating report by declarant; termination.

The declarant shall, during any period of control of the condominium by the declarant pursuant to § 42-1903.02 file a report in the form prescribed by the rules of the Mayor within 30 days of each anniversary date of the order registering the condominium. The report shall reflect any material changes in information contained in the original application for registration. In the event that the annual report reveals that all of the units in the condominium have been disposed of, and that all periods for conversion or expansion have expired, the Mayor shall issue an order terminating the registration of the condominium.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title IV, § 407, 23 DCR 9532b
This section is referenced in § 42-1904.01.
1981 Ed., § 45-1867.
1973 Ed., § 5-1267.